Connecticut, session 2026, HB05033.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 10-71 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, for the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2004, to June 30, 2022, inclusive, and for the fiscal [year]
years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the amount of the grants
payable to towns, regional boards of education or regional educational
service centers in accordance with this section shall be reduced
proportionately if the total of such grants in such year exceeds the
amount appropriated for the purposes of this section for such year.
Sec. 2. Subsection (i) of section 10-217a of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, for the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2008, to June 30, [2026] 2027, inclusive, the amount of
the grants payable to local or regional boards of education in accordance
with this section shall be reduced proportionately if the total of such
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5033
grants in such year exceeds the amount appropriated for purposes of
this section.
Sec. 3. Subsection (i) of section 10-145o of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(i) The Department of Education [, in consultation with EASTCONN,]
shall create a data system for local and regional school districts to access
the resources and record-keeping tools to manage the teacher education
and mentoring program at the local level. Such data system shall include
(1) templates for (A) writing and updating each district's plan, (B)
recording each teacher's completion of each of the five instructional
modules, and (C) teachers to record the completion of instructional
module activities and submit written reflection papers or projects, and
(2) links to on-line programs or workshops that are part of the five
modules.
Sec. 4. Subsection (a) of section 10-76mmm of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the Department of Education shall, within available
appropriations, administer the special education training, education
and testing competitive grant program. Under the grant program, the
department shall award grants to individual educators and
paraeducators for the purpose of covering the costs associated with any
professional training, education and testing requirements relating to
such individual's ability to provide special education and related
services. The department shall develop criteria for reviewing and
awarding grants under the program, and such criteria shall take into
consideration the financial need of the applicant and give priority to
those applicants with the greatest financial need. As used in this section,
"educators and paraeducators" includes individuals who are enrolled in
a teacher preparation program, as defined in section 10-10a, candidates
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5033
for professional certification as an educator under chapter 166, teachers
employed by a local or regional board of education, prospective
paraeducators and paraeducators employed by a local or regional board
of education.
Sec. 5. Subsection (a) of section 10-76nnn of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the Department Education shall, within available
appropriations, establish a grant program to support local and regional
boards of education in providing support services for students who
require special education and have experienced trauma or have
behavioral health needs. Such grant shall be available to each local or
regional board of education that provides support services, including,
but not limited to, trauma-informed care coordination and family
outreach, for such students and such students' families in partnership
with community service providers, including, but not limited to, family
service centers. Grants shall be funded in an amount prescribed by the
Commissioner of Education.
Sec. 6. Section 10-4x of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
For the school year commencing July 1, 2026, and each school year
thereafter, the Department of Education shall, within available
appropriations, at least quarterly, host trainings for persons hired or
designated to serve as an instructional support partner, as described in
section 10-220t. Such training shall include, but need not be limited to,
effective literacy and math instruction, personalized learning and
individualized instruction for students with disabilities, improving
classroom management, effective instructional methods and behavioral
supports, and transition plans for students with disabilities.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June 30,
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5033
2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Education shall,
within available appropriations, administer a teacher apprenticeship
program.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-71(d)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-217a(i)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-145o(i)
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 10-76mmm(a)
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 10-76nnn(a)
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 10-4x
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 New section
ED Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 4 of 4